Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Presumption of Abandonment

38-13-201.
When property presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210, the following property is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner during the period specified in this section:

A traveler’s check, fifteen years after issuance;

A money order, seven years after issuance;

A state or municipal bond, a bearer bond, or an original-issue-discount bond, three years after the earliest of the date the bond matures or is called or the obligation to pay the principal of the bond arises;

A debt of a business association, three years after the obligation to pay arises;

Repealed.

Money or a credit owed to a customer as a result of a retail business transaction, other than in-store credit for returned merchandise, three years after the obligation arose;

An amount owed by an insurance company on a life or endowment insurance policy or an annuity contract that has matured or terminated, three years after the obligation to pay arose under the terms of the policy or contract or, if a policy or contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death has not matured by proof of the death of the insured or annuitant, as follows:

With respect to an amount owed on a life or endowment insurance policy, three years after the earlier of the date:

The insurance company has knowledge of the death of the insured; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve for the policy is based; and

With respect to an amount owed on an annuity contract, three years after the date the insurance company has knowledge of the death of the annuitant;

Property distributable by a business association in the course of dissolution, one year after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a court, including property received as proceeds of a class action, one year after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, including municipal bond interest and unredeemed principal under the administration of a paying agent or indenture trustee, one year after the property becomes distributable;

Wages, commissions, bonuses, or reimbursements to which an employee is entitled, or other compensation for personal services, other than amounts held in a payroll card, one year after the amount becomes payable;

Except as otherwise provided for unclaimed utility deposits under section 40-8.5-106, a deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one year after the deposit or refund becomes payable; and

All other property not specified in this section or sections 38-13-202 to 38-13-208 and 38-13-213 to 38-13-220, the earlier of three years after the owner first has a right to demand the property or the obligation to pay or distribute the property arises.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 414, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(1)(e) repealed,(SB 21-121), ch. 32, p. 132, § 2, effective April 15.

38-13-202.
When tax-deferred retirement account presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210, property held in a pension account or retirement account that qualifies for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three years after the later of:

The following dates:

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section, the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

If the second communication is sent later than thirty days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The earlier of the following dates:

The date the apparent owner becomes seventy and one-half years of age, if reasonably determinable by the holder; or

If the federal “Internal Revenue Code of 1986”, as amended, 26 U.S.C. sec. 1 et seq., requires distribution to avoid a tax penalty, two years after the date the holder:

Receives confirmation of the death of the apparent owner in the ordinary course of its business; or

Confirms the death of the apparent owner under subsection (2) of this section.

If a holder in the ordinary course of its business receives notice or an indication of the death of an apparent owner and subsection (1)(b) of this section applies, the holder shall attempt not later than ninety days after receipt of the notice or indication to confirm whether the apparent owner is deceased.

If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of an account described in subsection (1) of this section by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner’s interest in the property by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than two years after the apparent owner’s last indication of interest in the property; except that the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication not later than thirty days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (3) of this section is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, the property is presumed abandoned three years after the later of:

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, the date a second consecutive communication to contact the apparent owner sent by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered;

If the second communication is sent later than thirty days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered; or

The date established by subsection (1)(b) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 415, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-203.
When other tax-deferred account presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210 and except for property described in section 38-13-202 and property held in a plan described in section 529A of the federal “Internal Revenue Code of 1986”, as amended, 26 U.S.C. sec. 529A, property held in an account or plan, including a health savings account, that qualifies for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the owner three years after the earlier of:

The date, if reasonably determinable by the holder, specified in the income tax laws and regulations of the United States by which distribution of the property must begin to avoid a tax penalty, with no distribution having been made; or

Thirty years after the date the account was opened.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 416, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-204.
When custodial account for minor presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210, property held in an account established under a state’s Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by or on behalf of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened three years after the later of:

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service;

If the second communication is sent later than thirty days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered; or

The date, if reasonably determinable by the holder, on which the custodian is required to transfer the property to the minor or the minor’s estate in accordance with the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act or Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of the state in which the account was opened.

If the holder does not send communications to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf an account described in subsection (1) of this section was opened by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the custodian’s interest in the property by sending the custodian an electronic-mail communication not later than two years after the custodian’s last indication of interest in the property; except that the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the custodian by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the custodian an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the custodian’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The custodian does not respond to the electronic-mail communication not later than thirty days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (2) of this section is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service, the property is presumed abandoned three years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication to contact the custodian by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The date established by subsection (1)(c) of this section.

When the property in the account described in subsection (1) of this section is transferred to the minor on whose behalf an account was opened or to the minor’s estate, the property in the account is no longer subject to this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 417, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-205.
When contents of safe-deposit box presumed abandoned.

Tangible property held in a safe-deposit box and proceeds from a sale of the property by the holder permitted by law of this state other than this article 13 are presumed abandoned if the property remains unclaimed by the apparent owner five years after the earlier of the:

Expiration of the lease or rental period for the box; or

Earliest date when the lessor of the box is authorized by law of this state other than this article 13 to enter the box and remove or dispose of the contents without consent or authorization of the lessee.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 418, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-206.
When stored-value card presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210, the net value of a stored-value card other than a gift card is presumed abandoned on the latest of three years after:

December 31 of the year in which the card is issued or additional funds are deposited into it;

The most recent indication of interest in the card by the apparent owner; or

A verification or review of the balance by or on behalf of the apparent owner.

The amount presumed abandoned in a stored-value card is the net card value at the time it is presumed abandoned.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 418, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-207.
When gift card presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210, a gift card is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner five years after the later of the date of purchase or its most recent use.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 418, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-207.5.
Bank deposits and funds in financial organizations - definition.

Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a financial organization, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual investment certificate, or any other interest in a financial organization is presumed abandoned unless the owner, within five years, has:

In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest;

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the property;

Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the financial organization;

Owned other property to which subsection (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c) of this section applies and unless the financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be presumed abandoned under this subsection (1) at the address to which communications regarding the other property regularly are sent; or

Had another relationship with the financial organization concerning which the owner has:

Communicated in writing with the financial organization; or

Otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization and unless the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be abandoned under this subsection (1) at the address to which communications regarding the other relationship regularly are sent.

Any property described in subsection (1) of this section that is automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection (1) of this section upon the expiration of its initial time period, but, in the case of any renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with the financial organization or otherwise indicating consent as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the organization, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in section 38-13-603, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would result.

For purposes of this section, “property” includes interest and dividends.

History.

Source:
L. 2021:

Entire section added,(SB 21-121), ch. 32, p. 132, § 3, effective April 15.

38-13-208.
When security presumed abandoned.

Subject to section 38-13-210, a security is presumed abandoned three years after:

The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

If the second communication is made later than thirty days after the first communication is returned, the date the first communication is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service.

If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of a security by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner’s interest in the security by sending the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication not later than two years after the apparent owner’s last indication of interest in the security. However, the holder promptly shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:

The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent owner an electronic-mail communication or the holder believes that the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address in the holder’s records is not valid;

The holder receives notification that the electronic-mail communication was not received; or

The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic-mail communication not later than thirty days after the communication was sent.

If first-class United States mail sent under subsection (2) of this section is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, the security is presumed abandoned three years after the date the mail is returned.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 419, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-209.
When related property interest presumed abandoned.

At and after the time property is presumed abandoned under this part 2, any other property right or interest accrued or accruing from the property and not previously presumed abandoned is also presumed abandoned.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 419, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-210.
Indication of apparent owner interest in property.

The period after which property is presumed abandoned is measured from the later of:

The date the property is presumed abandoned under this part 2; or

The latest indication of interest by the apparent owner in the property.

Under this article 13, an indication of an apparent owner’s interest in property includes:

A record communicated by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held;

An oral communication by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held, if the holder or its agent contemporaneously makes and preserves a record of the fact of the apparent owner’s communication;

Presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of a dividend, interest payment, or other distribution, or evidence of receipt of a distribution made by electronic or similar means, with respect to an account, underlying security, or interest in a business association;

Activity directed by an apparent owner in the account in which the property is held, including accessing the account or information concerning the account, or a direction by the apparent owner to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or type of property held in the account;

Making a deposit into or withdrawal from an account at a financial organization, including an automatic deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the apparent owner other than an automatic reinvestment of dividends or interest or fees and charges assessed by the holder or an affiliated service provider;

Subject to subsection (5) of this section, payment of a premium on an insurance policy; and

Any other action by the apparent owner that reasonably demonstrates to the holder that the apparent owner is aware that the property exists.

An action by an agent or other representative of an apparent owner, other than the holder acting as the apparent owner’s agent, is presumed to be an action on behalf of the apparent owner.

A communication with an apparent owner by a person other than the holder or the holder’s representative is not an indication of interest in the property by the apparent owner unless a record of the communication evidences the apparent owner’s knowledge of a right to the property.

If the insured dies or the insured or beneficiary of an insurance policy otherwise becomes entitled to the proceeds before depletion of the cash surrender value of the policy by operation of an automatic-premium-loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in the policy, the operation does not prevent the policy from maturing or terminating.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 419, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-211.
Knowledge of death of insured or annuitant - definition.

In this section, “death master file” means the United States social security administration’s death master file or other database or service that is at least as comprehensive as the United States social security administration’s death master file for determining that an individual reportedly has died.

With respect to a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death, but that has not matured by proof of death of the insured or annuitant, the company has knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant when:

The company receives a death certificate or a court order determining that the insured or annuitant has died;

Due diligence performed as required under Colorado law to maintain contact with the insured or annuitant or determine whether the insured or annuitant has died, validates the death of the insured or annuitant;

The company conducts a comparison for any purpose between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company’s insureds or annuitants, finds a match that provides notice that the insured or annuitant has died, and validates the death;

The administrator or the administrator’s agent conducts a comparison for the purpose of finding matches during an examination conducted under part 10 of this article 13 between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company’s insureds or annuitants, finds a match that provides notice that the insured or annuitant has died, and the company validates the death; or

The company:

Receives notice of the death of the insured or annuitant from an administrator, beneficiary, policy owner, relative of the insured, or trustee or from a personal representative, executor, or other legal representative of the insured’s or annuitant’s estate; and

Validates the death of the insured or annuitant.

The following rules apply under this section:

A death-master-file match under subsection (2)(c) or (2)(d) of this section occurs if the criteria for an exact or partial match are satisfied as provided by the “Unclaimed Life Insurance Benefits Act”, part 8 of article 7 of title 10.

The death-master-file match does not constitute proof of death for the purpose of submission to an insurance company of a claim by a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract for an amount due under an insurance policy or annuity contract.

The death-master-file match or validation of the insured’s or annuitant’s death does not alter the requirements for a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract to make a claim to receive proceeds under the terms of the policy or contract.

If no provision in title 10 or rules of the commissioner of insurance establishes a time for the validation of a death of an insured or annuitant, the insurance company shall make a good-faith effort using other available records and information to validate the death and document the effort taken not later than ninety days after the insurance company has notice of the death.

This article 13 does not affect the determination of the extent to which an insurance company, before July 1, 2020, had knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant or was required to conduct a death-master-file comparison to determine whether amounts owed by the company on a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract were presumed abandoned or unclaimed.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 421, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-212.
Deposit account for insurance policy or annuity contract.

If proceeds payable under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract are deposited into an account with check- or draft-writing privileges for the beneficiary of the policy or contract and, under a supplementary contract not involving annuity benefits other than death benefits, the proceeds are retained by the insurance company or the financial organization where the account is held, the policy or contract includes the assets in the account.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 422, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-213.
Refunds held by business associations.

Except to the extent otherwise ordered by a court or administrative agency, any sum that a business association has been ordered to refund by a court or administrative agency that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one year after it became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund, whether or not the final determination or order requires any person entitled to a refund to make a claim for it, is presumed abandoned.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 422, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-214.
Foreclosure sale - overbid.

Any overbid, as defined in section 38-38-100.3, that is equal to or greater than twenty-five dollars and that remains unclaimed for six months after the date of sale is presumed abandoned.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 422, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-215.
Funds held in lawyer COLTAF trust accounts - exemption - definition.

This article 13 does not apply to money held in a lawyer COLTAF trust account.

As used in this section, “lawyer COLTAF trust account” means a Colorado lawyer trust account foundation trust account in which a lawyer, in accordance with the lawyer’s professional obligations, holds funds of clients or third persons that are nominal in amount or that are expected to be held for a short period.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 422, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-216.
Money held by the public employees’ retirement association - definitions.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Account left inactive” means the contributions of any nonvested member who has terminated employment with an employer if the member’s member contribution account with the association has been left inactive.

“Association” means the public employees’ retirement association created pursuant to section 24-51-201.

“Benefit” has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-51-101 (7).

“Benefit recipient” has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-51-101 (8).

“Employer” has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-51-101 (20).

“Member” has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-51-101 (29).

“Unclaimed benefit” means a benefit owed to any benefit recipient if the benefit remains unpaid.

“Unclaimed member refund” means the contributions of a member who has terminated employment with an employer and who has requested a refund of the contributions if the refund remains unpaid.

Any money and any accrued interest held by the association for accounts left inactive, unclaimed benefits, or unclaimed member refunds are presumed abandoned if the money, benefit, or refund remains unclaimed for more than five years after the money, benefit, or refund becomes payable or distributable pursuant to article 51 of title 24 unless the owner of the money, within five years, has:

Communicated in writing with the association concerning the money; or

Otherwise indicated an interest in the money as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the association.

Property that is presumed abandoned pursuant to this section is the only property held by the association that is subject to this article 13.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 423, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-217.
Gaming chips or tokens - gaming award points - inapplicability.

This article 13 does not apply to gaming award points and gaming chips or tokens issued or sold by a licensed gaming establishment before, on, or after August 4, 2004, except to the extent the state has taken custody of any gaming award points or gaming chips or tokens on or before January 1, 2004.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 423, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-218.
Property held by racetracks - inapplicability.

This article 13 does not apply to any intangible unclaimed property held by a racetrack, as defined in section 44-32-102 (24).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 424, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-219.
Unclaimed gift cards - limited exception.

This article 13 does not apply to unclaimed gift cards if the holder or issuer is a business association with annual gross receipts from the sales or issuance of all gift cards totaling two hundred thousand dollars or less.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 424, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-220.
Tax refunds.

On and after October 1, 2002, any amount due and payable as a refund of Colorado income tax or grant for property taxes, rent, or heat or fuel expenses assistance represented by a warrant that has not been presented for payment within six months after the date of issuance of the warrant and that has been forwarded by the department of revenue to the administrator pursuant to section 39-21-108 (5) is presumed abandoned.

On and after October 1, 2010, any amount due and payable as a refund of a tax imposed or assessed by the department of revenue that is not addressed in subsection (1) of this section, that is represented by a warrant that has not been presented for payment within six months after the date of issuance of the warrant, and that has been forwarded by the department to the administrator pursuant to section 39-21-108 (7) is presumed abandoned.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 424, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.